New Jersey, session 222, A134.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer who is a qualified health care professional employed by a health care entity in the State shall be allowed a deduction from the taxpayers gross income for the taxable year in an amount equal to 25 percent of the hourly wages paid by the health care entity to the taxpayer during the taxable year. b.    For purposes of this subsection: Health care entity means a health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), a health maintenance organization authorized to operate pursuant to P.L.1973, c.337 (C.26:2J-1 et seq.), a carrier which offers a managed care plan regulated pursuant to P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-1 et seq.), a State or county psychiatric hospital, a State developmental center, a staffing registry, or a home care services agency as defined in section 1 of P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-23). Qualified health care professional means an individual who is: (1)  licensed as a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, advanced practice nurse, physician assistant, or respiratory care practitioner pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes; (2)  certified as a homemaker-home health aide by the New Jersey Board of Nursing pursuant to paragraph (24) of subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-24); (3)  certified as a nurse aide by the New Jersey Department of Health upon completion of a mandatory training program; or (4)  certified as a direct support professional through the College of Direct Support, as administered by the Boggs Center on Disability and Human Development, Rutgers, Robert Wood Johnson Medical School. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the year next following the date of enactment.